Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Progressing


Rural Economic Prosperity Fund, created in Section 256 of Title 62


of the Oklahoma Statutes, from any monies not otherwise appropriated


from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal


year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Eight Million Dollars


($8,000,000.00) for availability of appropriation.


SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma


Department of Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated


from the Progressing Rural Economic Prosperity Fund, created in


Section 256 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the sum of Eight


Million Dollars ($8,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be


necessary to construct a public safety complex network within a


thirty-mile radius of a municipality located north of Interstate 40

Req. No. 3374 Page 1


and east of Interstate 44 with a population larger than thirty-five


thousand (35,000) residents and below fifty thousand (50,000)


residents according to the most recent Federal Decennial Census.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3374 AS 12/30/2025 3:59:39 PM





























Req. No. 3374 Page 2